Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-12] Apprehension of deserters.
Any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the
United States or this State or of a state, territory, commonwealth, or
possession, or the District of Columbia may summarily apprehend a deserter from
the state military forces and deliver the deserter into the custody of the
state military forces. If an offender is apprehended outside the State, the
offender's return to the area shall be in accordance with normal extradition
procedures or reciprocal agreement. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next